District of Columbia statutes.
48-831.04

Cost containment and savings with respect to existing publicly funded pharmaceutical programs.

The Department shall make every effort to reduce and contain the cost of prescription drugs purchased for publicly funded pharmaceutical assistance programs, including D.C. Medicaid, the D.C. Health Care Alliance, and the Department of Mental Health. These efforts shall include manufacturer rebates, pharmacy discounts, and reductions through aggregate purchases, and may include importation of pharmaceuticals from outside of the United States. These savings shall be deposited in the AccessRx Fund established in § 48-831.10

May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-164, § 104, 51 DCR 3688